Illinois, session 104th, SB222.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Child Care Act of 1969 is amended by 5changing Section 4.1 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 10/4.1)  (from Ch. 23, par. 2214.1)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-594)8    Sec. 4.1. Criminal background investigations. 9    (a) In this Section, "conditional employee" means an 10employee who has completed a background check and is waiting 11for confirmation from the Department.12    (b) The Department shall require that each child care 13facility license applicant, as part of the application 14process, and each employee and volunteer of a child care 15facility or non-licensed service provider, as a condition of 16employment, authorize an investigation to determine if such 17applicant, employee, or volunteer has ever been charged with a 18crime and if so, the disposition of those charges; this 19authorization shall indicate the scope of the inquiry and the 20agencies which may be contacted. Upon this authorization, the 21Director shall request and receive information and assistance 22from any federal, State, or local governmental agency as part 23of the authorized investigation. Each applicant, employee, or   SB0222- 2 -LRB104 06046 AAS 16079 b1volunteer of a child care facility or non-licensed service 2provider shall submit the applicant's, employee's, or 3volunteer's fingerprints to the Illinois State Police in the 4form and manner prescribed by the Illinois State Police. These 5fingerprints shall be checked against the fingerprint records 6now and hereafter filed in the Illinois State Police and 7Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history records 8databases. The Illinois State Police shall charge a fee for 9conducting the criminal history records check, which shall be 10deposited in the State Police Services Fund and shall not 11exceed the actual cost of the records check. The Illinois 12State Police shall provide information concerning any criminal 13charges, and their disposition, now or hereafter filed, 14against an applicant, employee, or volunteer of a child care 15facility or non-licensed service provider upon request of the 16Department of Children and Family Services when the request is 17made in the form and manner required by the Illinois State 18Police.19    Information concerning convictions of a license applicant, 20employee, or volunteer of a child care facility or 21non-licensed service provider investigated under this Section, 22including the source of the information and any conclusions or 23recommendations derived from the information, shall be 24provided, upon request, to such applicant, employee, or 25volunteer of a child care facility or non-licensed service 26provider prior to final action by the Department on the   SB0222- 3 -LRB104 06046 AAS 16079 b1application. State conviction information provided by the 2Illinois State Police regarding employees, prospective 3employees, or volunteers of non-licensed service providers and 4child care facilities licensed under this Act shall be 5provided to the operator of such facility, and, upon request, 6to the employee, prospective employee, or volunteer of a child 7care facility or non-licensed service provider. Any 8information concerning criminal charges and the disposition of 9such charges obtained by the Department shall be confidential 10and may not be transmitted outside the Department, except as 11required herein, and may not be transmitted to anyone within 12the Department except as needed for the purpose of evaluating 13an application or an employee or volunteer of a child care 14facility or non-licensed service provider. Only information 15and standards which bear a reasonable and rational relation to 16the performance of a child care facility shall be used by the 17Department or any licensee. Any employee of the Department of 18Children and Family Services, Illinois State Police, or a 19child care facility receiving confidential information under 20this Section who gives or causes to be given any confidential 21information concerning any criminal convictions of an 22applicant, employee, or volunteer of a child care facility or 23non-licensed service provider, shall be guilty of a Class A 24misdemeanor unless release of such information is authorized 25by this Section.26    A child care facility, including, but not limited to, a   SB0222- 4 -LRB104 06046 AAS 16079 b1child welfare agency, may hire, on a probationary basis, any 2employee or volunteer of a child care facility or non-licensed 3service provider completing authorizing a criminal background 4investigation under this Section, pending the result of such 5investigation. A conditional employee may work in a child care 6facility, including, but not limited to, a child welfare 7agency, if the conditional employee is supervised by a 8licensed employee, does not have contact with children who are 9under the care and control of the child care facility, and does 10not have access to records containing information regarding 11children who are under the care and control of the child care 12facility. Employees and volunteers of a child care facility or 13non-licensed service provider shall be notified prior to 14hiring that such employment may be terminated on the basis of 15criminal background information obtained by the facility. An 16applicant is determined to have completed the criminal 17background investigation when he or she has completed and 18submitted authorization for the performance of a criminal 19background investigation by the Department. 20(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 103-22, eff. 8-8-23.) 21    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-594)22    Sec. 4.1. Criminal background investigations. 23    (a) In this Section, "conditional employee" means an 24employee who has completed a background check and is waiting 25for confirmation from the Department.  SB0222- 5 -LRB104 06046 AAS 16079 b1    (b) The Department of Children and Family Services or the 2Department of Early Childhood shall require that each child 3care facility license applicant under the agencies' respective 4authority, as part of the application process, and each 5employee and volunteer of a child care facility or 6non-licensed service provider, as a condition of employment, 7authorize an investigation to determine if such applicant, 8employee, or volunteer has ever been charged with a crime and 9if so, the disposition of those charges; this authorization 10shall indicate the scope of the inquiry and the agencies which 11may be contacted. Upon this authorization, the Director shall 12request and receive information and assistance from any 13federal, State, or local governmental agency as part of the 14authorized investigation. Each applicant, employee, or 15volunteer of a child care facility or non-licensed service 16provider shall submit the applicant's, employee's, or 17volunteer's fingerprints to the Illinois State Police in the 18form and manner prescribed by the Illinois State Police. These 19fingerprints shall be checked against the fingerprint records 20now and hereafter filed in the Illinois State Police and 21Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history records 22databases. The Illinois State Police shall charge a fee for 23conducting the criminal history records check, which shall be 24deposited in the State Police Services Fund and shall not 25exceed the actual cost of the records check. The Illinois 26State Police shall provide information concerning any criminal   SB0222- 6 -LRB104 06046 AAS 16079 b1charges, and their disposition, now or hereafter filed, 2against an applicant, employee, or volunteer of a child care 3facility or non-licensed service provider upon request of the 4Department of Children and Family Services or the Department 5of Early Childhood when the request is made in the form and 6manner required by the Illinois State Police.7    Information concerning convictions of a license applicant, 8employee, or volunteer of a child care facility or 9non-licensed service provider investigated under this Section, 10including the source of the information and any conclusions or 11recommendations derived from the information, shall be 12provided, upon request, to such applicant, employee, or 13volunteer of a child care facility or non-licensed service 14provider prior to final action by the Department of Children 15and Family Services or the Department of Early Childhood under 16the agencies' respective authority on the application. State 17conviction information provided by the Illinois State Police 18regarding employees, prospective employees, or volunteers of 19non-licensed service providers and child care facilities 20licensed under this Act shall be provided to the operator of 21such facility, and, upon request, to the employee, prospective 22employee, or volunteer of a child care facility or 23non-licensed service provider. Any information concerning 24criminal charges and the disposition of such charges obtained 25by the Department of Children and Family Services or the 26Department of Early Childhood shall be confidential and may   SB0222- 7 -LRB104 06046 AAS 16079 b1not be transmitted outside the Department of Children and 2Family Services or the Department of Early Childhood, except 3as required herein, and may not be transmitted to anyone 4within the Department of Children and Family Services or the 5Department of Early Childhood except as needed for the purpose 6of evaluating an application or an employee or volunteer of a 7child care facility or non-licensed service provider. Only 8information and standards which bear a reasonable and rational 9relation to the performance of a child care facility shall be 10used by the Department of Children and Family Services or the 11Department of Early Childhood or any licensee. Any employee of 12the Department of Children and Family Services, Department of 13Early Childhood, Illinois State Police, or a child care 14facility receiving confidential information under this Section 15who gives or causes to be given any confidential information 16concerning any criminal convictions of an applicant, employee, 17or volunteer of a child care facility or non-licensed service 18provider, shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor unless 19release of such information is authorized by this Section.20    A child care facility, including, but not limited to, a 21child welfare agency, may hire, on a probationary basis, any 22employee or volunteer of a child care facility or non-licensed 23service provider completing authorizing a criminal background 24investigation under this Section, pending the result of such 25investigation. A conditional employee may work in a child care 26facility, including, but not limited to, a child welfare   SB0222- 8 -LRB104 06046 AAS 16079 b1agency, if the conditional employee is supervised by a 2licensed employee, does not have contact with children who are 3under the care and control of the child care facility, and does 4not have access to records containing information regarding 5children who are under the care and control of the child care 6facility. Employees and volunteers of a child care facility or 7non-licensed service provider shall be notified prior to 8hiring that such employment may be terminated on the basis of 9criminal background information obtained by the facility. An 10applicant is determined to have completed the criminal 11background investigation when he or she has completed and 12submitted authorization for the performance of a criminal 13background investigation by the Department. 14(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 103-22, eff. 8-8-23; 15103-594, eff. 7-1-26.) 16    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 17changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 18that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 19represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 20not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 21made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 22Public Act.